Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-269
Mutual irrigation companies; recognized; bylaws; when lawful.

Any corporation or association organized under the laws of this state for the purpose of constructing and operating canals, reservoirs, and other works for irrigation purposes, and deriving no revenue from their operation, shall be termed a mutual irrigation company, and any bylaws adopted by such company, not in conflict herewith, shall be deemed lawful and so recognized by the courts of this state; Provided, such bylaws do not impair the rights of one shareholder over another.

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. VII, art. V, div. 3, § 24, p. 855;

C.S.1922, § 8474;

C.S.1929, § 46-624;

R.S.1943, § 46-269.

Mutual canal company possesses only those powers expressly or impliedly granted. Thirty Mile Canal Co. v. Carskadon, 160 Neb. 496, 70 N.W.2d 432 (1955).

Stockholder in mutual irrigation company cannot compel company to furnish him water without payment of his share of maintenance fund. Swanger v. Porter, 87 Neb. 764, 128 N.W. 516 (1910).

Duty of those in charge to operate so as to obtain profit applies to mutual irrigation company. Robbins v. Winters Creek Canal Co., 109 F.2d 849 (8th Cir. 1940).